Hawaii, session 2026, HB2450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 279 Session Laws of Hawaii 2022 (Act 279) appropriated $600,000,000 to the department of Hawaiian home lands to purchase and develop land and units and to provide assistance and other services for applicants on the department's waiting list.  As part of Act 279, the department of Hawaiian home lands must submit an annual report to the legislature that includes an accounting of expenditures and the number of applicants on the waiting list. The legislature believes that additional oversight of the moneys appropriated by Act 279 is warranted to ensure that the resources are used efficiently and effectively to benefit as many families as possible. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the state auditor to conduct a financial and performance audit of the department of Hawaiian home lands. SECTION 2.  The auditor shall conduct a financial and performance audit of the department of Hawaiian home lands.  The audit shall include: (1)  An accounting and review of the department's use of the moneys appropriated by Act 279, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022; (2)  An accounting and review of moneys received by the department from all sources; (3)  An inventory of lands and units held by the department; (4)  A review of all developments in progress by the department; (5)  A summary of plans for future developments by the department; and (6)  An accounting and review of all revenue generated by the department and its projects. SECTION 3.  The auditor shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________